en: Fresh coriander leaves, Fresh coriander
da: Friske korianderblade
de: frische Korianderblätter
es: Hojas de cilantro fresco
fi: Tuoreet korianterin lehdet, Tuore korianteri
fr: Feuilles de coriandre fraîche, Coriandre fraiche
hr: Svježe lišće korijandera
lt: Švieži kalendros lapai
nl: Verse korianderbladeren
sv: Färska korianderblad

en: Ground coriander leaves, Ground dried coriander leaves
da: Tørrede malede karianderblade
de: trocken gemahlene Korianderblätter
es: Hojas de cilantro seco molido
fr: Coriandre en poudre, Coriandre moulue, Feuilles de coriandre sèche moulue
hr: Mljeveno lišće korijandra
lt: Džiovinti malti kalendros lapai
nl: Gemalen gedroogde korianderbladeren
sv: Torkade malna korianderblad

en: Potted coriander
da: Koriander i krukke
de: Koriander im Topf
es: Macetas de cilantro, Cilantro en maceta
fr: Coriandre en pot
hr: Korijander u loncima
lt: Kalendra vazonėlyje
nl: Korianders in pot
sv: Koriander i kruka

en: Coriander seeds
bg: Семена от кориандър
da: Korianderfrø
de: Koriandersamen
es: Semillas de cilantro
fr: Graines de coriandre
hr: Sjemenke korijandera
lt: Kalendros sėklos
nl: Korianderzaden
pl: Nasiona kolendry, Owoce kolendry
sv: Korianderfrö

en: Dill
bg: Копър
de: Dill
es: Eneldo
fi: Tilli
fr: Aneth, Fenouil bâtard, Faux anis, Fenouil puant
hr: Kopar
ja: イノンド, ディル
la: Anethum graveolens
lt: Krapai
nl: Dille
pl: Koper ogrodowy, Koperek, Koper
zh: 莳萝

en: Fresh dill
bg: Пресен копър
de: frischer Dill
es: Eneldo fresco
fr: Aneth fraîche, Aneth frais
hr: Svježi kopar
lt: Švieži krapai
nl: Verse dille
pl: Koper ogrodowy świeży, Koperek świeży, Koper świeży

en: Frozen dill
de: gefrorener Dill
es: Eneldo congelado
fr: Aneth surgelé
hr: Smrznuti kopar
lt: Šaldyti krapai
nl: Bevroren dille
pl: Koper ogrodowy mrożony, Koperek mrożony, Koper mrożony

en: Ground dried dill
de: trocken gemahlener Dill
es: Eneldo seco molido
fr: Aneth sèche moulue
hr: Samljeveni suhi kopar
lt: Džiovinti malti krapai
nl: Gemalen gedroogde dille
pl: Koper mielony suszony, Koperek mielony suszony

en: Dried dill
fr: Aneth séchée
hr: Sušeni kopar
pl: Koper suszony, Koperek suszony

en: Dill seeds
da: Dildfrø
de: Dillsaat
es: Semillas de eneldo
fi: Tillinsiemen
fr: Graines d'aneth
hr: Sjeme kopra
it: Semi di aneto
nb: Dillfrø
nl: Dillezaad
nn: Dillfrø
sv: Dillfrön

en: Fresh chervil, Garden chervil products, Garden chervil, Chervil
bg: Керевиз
de: Kerbel
es: Productos del perifollo, Perifollo, Cerefolio, Perifolio
fr: Cerfeuil, Cerfeuil frais, Produits de le cerfeuil commun, Cerfeuil commun
hr: Prave krasuljice, čerfoli
ja: チャービル
la: Anthriscus cerefolium
nl: Kervelproducten
pl: Trybula ogrodowa

fr: Cerfeuil tubéreux, Cerfeuil bulbeux
de: Knolliger Kälberkropf, Knollenkerbel, Rüben-Kälberkropf, Kerbelrübe, Knollen-Kälberkropf

en: Garden chervil leaves, Chervil leaves
de: Kerbelblätter
es: Hojas de perifollo, Hojas de cerefolio, Hojas de perifolio
fr: Feuilles de cerfeuil, Feuilles de cerfeuil commun
hr: Lišće vrtnog češnjevka
nl: Kervelbladeren

en: Garden chervil seeds, Chervil seeds
de: Kerbelsamen
es: Semillas de perifollo, Semillas de perifolio
fr: Graines de cerfeuil, Graines de cerfeuil commun
hr: Sjeme vrtnog češnjevka
nl: Kervelzaden

en: Hyssop
de: Ysop, Fettblatt, Gnadenkraut
es: Hisopo
fr: Hysope, Hysope officinale
hr: Izop
ja: ヒソップ
la: Hyssopus officinalis
lt: Isopas, juozažolė
nl: Hyssoppen
pl: Hyzop lekarski

en: Juniper berries
af: Jenewerbessie
ar: توت العرعر
be: Ядловец
br: Jenevra
bs: Juniper
ca: Ginebró
cs: Jalovčinka
da: Enebær
de: Wacholderbeeren
es: Bayas de enebro
et: Marikäbi
fa: جونیپر بری
fi: Katajanmarjat, Katajanmarja
fr: Baies de genévrier
hr: Bobice kleke, Bobica kleke
hu: Borókabogyó
hy: Գիհու հատապտուղ
id: Juniper beri
it: Coccola di ginepro
ja: 杜松果
jv: Bèri juniper
ko: 두송자
la: Juniperi pseudo-fructus, Juniperus communis
lt: Kadagio uogos
lv: Čiekuroga
mk: Смрекинка
ml: ജൂനിപ്പർ കായ
mt: Frotta tal-ġnibru
nb: Einebær, Einerbær
nl: Jeneverbes, Jeneverbessen, Bessen van de jeneverbes
nn: Einebær, Einerbær
pl: Owoce jałowca, Owoc jałowca, Jałowiec
pt: Semente de zimbro, Baga de zimbro
ro: Boabă de ienupăr
ru: Можжевельник
sl: Brinova jagoda
sv: Enbär
tw: Juniper nnuaba a wɔfrɛ no berry
uk: Ялівець
uz: Archa mevasi
vi: Bách xù
zh: 杜松子

en: Dried juniper berries
da: Tørrede enebær
sv: Torkade enbär

en: Marjoram
bg: Майорана
de: Majoran
es: Mejorana, Mayorana
fr: Marjolaine, Origan des jardins
hr: Mažuran
ja: マジョラム
la: Origanum majorana
lt: Mairūnas, Mairūnai
nl: Marjolein
pl: Majeranek

en: Dried marjoram
fr: Marjolaine séchée
hr: Suhi mažuran
lt: Džiovinti mairūnai
pl: Majeranek suszony

en: Mint, Mentha, Pudina
bg: Мента
de: Minze
es: Menta
fi: minttu
fr: Menthe
hr: Metvica
hu: Menta
it: Menta
ja: ミント
la: Mentha
lt: Mėta
nl: Munt
pl: Mięta
zh: 薄荷